Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT ACT
32-9-111. Election of directors - dates - terms.

After the federal census in 1980 and each federal census thereafter, the board of directors shall apportion the composition of the board into compact and contiguous director districts so that the fifteen directors will represent, to the extent practical, the people of the district on the basis of population. Such apportionment shall be completed before March 15 of the second year following that in which the federal census is taken and shall be made only upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the total membership of the board. If such apportionment is not completed before March 15 of such year, the legislative council, with the assistance of the director of research of the legislative council and the director of the office of legislative legal services, shall, by April 15, apportion the composition of the board into compact and contiguous director districts so that the fifteen directors will represent, to the extent practicable, the people of the district on the basis of population. The apportionment recommended by the legislative council shall be submitted to the general assembly which shall approve or amend the apportionment before May 1 of such year.

If a petition or election results in the inclusion of an area within the district pursuant to section 32-9-106.7, the board shall, within forty-five days, vote to include the new area in one or more existing adjacent director districts based, to the extent practical, on population. The vote by the board shall require a two-thirds majority.

Such director districts shall be composed of general election precincts established by the boards of county commissioners of those counties, all or part of which are within the district, and by the election commission of the city and county of Denver. No general election precinct may be split into two or more director districts.

The regular district election shall be held jointly with the state general election in every even-numbered year as provided in section 1-7-116, C.R.S., and the first election shall be held in 1982. Each director shall be elected by the eligible electors residing within the director district.

Except as provided in this subsection (4), the regular term of office of directors shall be four years. At the election held in 1982, eight members of the board shall be elected for two-year terms. The two-year terms shall be determined by lot at the first meeting of the board following the apportionment of director districts. Seven members shall be elected for four-year terms.

Except as provided in this subsection (5), nominations for an election of directors shall be made in accordance with the general election laws of the state. Nominations for directors shall be made by petition and filed in the office of the secretary of state in the manner provided for independent candidates pursuant to section

1-4-802

and part 9 of article 4 of title 1, C.R.S. The petitions shall be signed by at least two hundred fifty eligible electors residing within the director district in which the officer is to be elected.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 908, § 160, effective January 1, 1993.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 908, § 160, effective January 1, 1993.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 908, § 160, effective January 1, 1993.)

It is the intent of the people of the state of Colorado that the election of directors be conducted in the most efficient and economical manner which is practicable.

Every candidate for director shall comply with the provisions of article 45 of title 1, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 908, § 160, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 717, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-10.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1304, § 3, effective July 1.

Initiated 80:

Entire section R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 19, 1980.

L. 81:

(1) and (5)(a)(III) amended, p. 1645, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1) amended and (5)(f) added, pp. 496, 497, §§ 1, 2, effective March 25.

L. 83:

(6) amended, p. 1282, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 88:

(1)(a) amended, p. 312, § 23, effective May 23.

L. 90:

(1)(a) amended, p. 325, § 5, effective June 9.

L. 91:

(5)(a) amended, p. 799, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 92:

(3), (5)(a) to (5)(d), and (6) amended, p. 908, § 160, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1339, § 3, effective May 25; (3) amended, p. 1643, § 69, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 1107, § 49, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 308, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1271, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 419, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 2001:

(5)(a) amended, p. 1005, § 16, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) amended, p. 835, § 7, effective May 14.

Editor's note:

For the complete initiated measure and the votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

32-9-112. Vacancies - appointments - recall.

A change of residence of a member of the board to a place outside the director district from which the member was elected shall automatically create a vacancy on the board. Upon a vacancy occurring for any reason other than normal expiration of a term, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the director district is located or, in the case of a member elected in Denver, by the mayor of the city and county of Denver, with the approval of the city council of said city and county. In the case of a director district which contains territory in two or more counties, or in the city and county of Denver and in one or more counties, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the largest number of eligible electors of the director district reside; except that, if the largest number of eligible electors of the director district reside in the city and county of Denver, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the mayor of the city and county of Denver, with the approval of the city council of the city and county.

(1.5) Any director appointed shall serve until the next regular election, at which time the vacancy shall be filled by election for any remaining unexpired portion of the term.

Effective July 1, 1983, any member of the board may be recalled from office by the eligible electors of the director district such member represents pursuant to the provisions of part 1 of article 12 of title 1, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 717, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-11.

L. 70:

p. 293, § 101.

L. 73:

p. 989, § 5.

Initiated 80:

Entire section R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 19, 1980.

L. 81:

(3) added, p. 1646, § 2, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(3) amended, p. 497, § 3, effective March 25.

L. 83:

(3) repealed, p. 2051, § 19, effective October 14.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 909, § 161, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

For the complete initiated measure and the votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

32-9-113. Fidelity bonds.

Each director, before entering upon his official duties, shall give a fidelity bond to the district in the sum of ten thousand dollars with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the governor, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his office. Premiums on all fidelity bonds provided for in this section shall be paid by the district and filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 717, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-12.

32-9-114. Board's administrative powers.

The board has the following administrative powers:

To fix the time and place at which its regular meetings, to be held at least quarterly, shall be held within the district and shall provide for the calling and holding of special meetings;

To adopt and amend bylaws and rules for procedure;

To elect one director as chairman of the board and another director as chairman pro tem of the board, and to appoint one or more persons as secretary and treasurer of the board;

To prescribe a system of business administration, to create necessary offices, and to establish the powers, duties, and compensation of all officers, agents, and employees and other persons contracting with the district, subject to the provisions of section 32-9-117;

To prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands;

To provide a method for the letting of contracts on a fair and competitive basis for the construction of works, any facility, or any project, or any interest therein, or for the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required in this article;

To designate an official newspaper published in the district in the English language; except that nothing in this article shall prevent the board from directing publication in any additional newspaper where it deems that the public necessity may so require;

To make and pass resolutions and orders necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 717, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-13.

32-9-115. Records of board - audits.

All resolutions and orders shall be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the presiding officer of the board and the secretary. Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions and orders shall be a public record. A record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, certificates, contracts, bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the district, and all corporate acts, which record shall also be a public record. The treasurer shall keep an account of all moneys received by and disbursed on behalf of the district, which shall also be a public record. Any public record of the district shall be open for inspection by any eligible elector of the district, or by any representative of the state, or of any county, city and county, city, or town within the district. All records are subject to audit as provided by law for political subdivisions.

Repealed.

In addition to the audit authorized in subsection (1) of this section and the audit required pursuant to section 29-1-603, C.R.S., at least once every five years, or more frequently in the state auditor's discretion, the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of the district to determine whether the district is effectively and efficiently fulfilling its statutory obligations. The first performance audit shall begin on or after January 1, 2005, and be completed as soon as possible thereafter. Upon the completion of a performance audit, the state auditor shall submit a written report to the legislative audit committee. The cost of the performance audits shall be paid by the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 718, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-14.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 679, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 82:

(2) repealed, p. 502, § 8, effective April 15.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 910, § 162, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(3) added, p. 1325, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 866, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 970, § 1, effective August 4.

32-9-116. Meetings of board.

All meetings of the board shall be held within the district and shall be open to the public. No business of the board shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present.

Repealed.

Effective January 1, 1983, any action of the board shall require the affirmative vote of at least eight members present and voting.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 718, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-15.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 497, § 4, effective March 25.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (2), effective January 1, 1983. (See L. 82, p. 497.)

32-9-117. Compensation of directors.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, effective January 1, 1983, each director shall receive a sum of three thousand dollars per annum.

Effective January 1, 2009, each director elected at the 2008 general election or at any general election thereafter and each director appointed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term of a director elected at the 2008 general election or any election thereafter shall receive a sum of twelve thousand dollars per annum, payable at the rate of one thousand dollars per month.

No director shall receive any compensation as an officer, engineer, attorney, employee, or any other agent of the district.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as preventing the board from authorizing the reimbursement of any director for expenses incurred that appertain to the activities of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 718, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-16.

Initiated 80:

Entire section R&RE, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 19, 1980.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1646, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1120, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 305, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

For the complete initiated measure and the votes cast for the adoption or rejection thereof, see L. 81, pp. 2057-2060.

32-9-118. Conflicts in interest prohibited.

No director, officer, employee, or agent of the district shall be interested in any contract or transaction with the district except in his official representative capacity.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 718, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-17.

32-9-119. Additional powers of district.

In addition to any other powers granted to the district in this article, the district has the following powers:

To have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a public body politic and corporate. The district shall be a political subdivision of the state.

To have perpetual existence and succession, subject to the provisions of section 32-9-158;

To adopt, have, and use a seal and to alter same at pleasure;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into any contract or agreement not inconsistent with this article or the laws of this state;

To borrow money and to issue district securities evidencing same;

To refund any loan or obligation of the district and to issue refunding securities therefor;

To purchase, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire, maintain, and dispose of real property and personal property and any interest therein;

To levy and cause to be collected taxes on all taxable property within the district, subject to the limitations imposed by this article and the laws of the state;

To employ such officers, agents, employees, and other persons necessary to carry out the purposes of this article and to acquire office space, equipment, services, supplies, and insurance necessary to carry out the purposes of this article;

To condemn property for public use;

To establish, maintain, and operate a mass transportation system, subject to the provisions of section 32-9-119.5 for the operation of the district's bus operations, and all necessary facilities relating thereto across or along any public street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way, or in, upon, under, or over any vacant public lands without first obtaining a franchise from the public body having jurisdiction over the same; except that the district shall cooperate with any public body having such jurisdiction and the district shall promptly restore any such street, highway, bridge, viaduct, or other public right-of-way to its former state of usefulness as nearly as may be and shall not use the same in such a manner as to impair completely or unnecessarily the usefulness thereof;

To implement the provisions of section 32-9-119.5 concerning the operation of the district's bus operations;

To fix and from time to time increase or decrease the revenues for services and facilities provided by the district; to pledge revenues for the payment of special district obligation bonds that have been issued in accordance with this article; and to enforce the collection of such revenues;

To deposit any moneys of the district not then needed in the conduct of district affairs in any banking institution within or without the district or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

To invest any surplus money in the district's treasury, including moneys in a sinking or reserve fund established for the purpose of retiring any district securities, not required for immediate necessities of the district in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To sell from time to time such securities thus purchased and held;

To accept grants or loans from the federal government, the state government, or any political subdivision thereof, to enter into contracts and cooperate with the federal government, the state government, or any political subdivision thereof, and to do all things necessary, not inconsistent with this article or the laws of this state, in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation;

To enter into joint operating or service contracts, and acquisition, improvement, equipment, or disposal contracts with any public body in the district concerning any mass transportation facility whether acquired by the district or by the public body; to perform such contracts; and to accept grants and contributions from any public body or any other person in connection therewith;

To enter upon any land within the district to make surveys, borings, soundings, and examinations for the purposes of the district;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all business and affairs relating to any mass transportation facility authorized in this article, subject to the provisions of section 32-9-119.5 for the operation of the district's bus operations, or otherwise concerning the district, and of the acquisition, improvement, equipment, operation, maintenance, and disposal of any property relating to any such mass transportation facility; except that the oversight of operations and facilities for safety purposes as required by 49 CFR 659, "Rail Fixed Guideway Systems; State Safety Oversight", and article 18 of title 40, C.R.S., shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado;

To enter into contracts of indemnity and guaranty;

To secure financial statements, appraisals, economic feasibility reports, and valuations of any type relating to the mass transportation system of the district or any facility therein;

To make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this article, or in the performance of the district's covenants or duties, or in order to secure the payment of district securities;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this article, which specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this article;

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted in this article.

(1.9) Repealed.

To provide revenue to finance the operations of the district, to defray the cost of construction of capital improvements and acquisition of capital equipment, and to pay the interest and principal on securities of the district, the board, for and on behalf of the district, has the power to levy uniformly throughout the district a sales tax at any rate that may be approved by the board, upon every transaction or other incident with respect to which a sales tax is now levied by the state, pursuant to the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S.

and (b.5) Repealed.

Sales tax levied pursuant to this subsection (2) shall be collected, administered, and enforced as follows:

The collection, administration, and enforcement of said sales tax shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as the collection, administration, and enforcement of the state sales tax imposed under article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., including, without limitation, the retention by a vendor of the percentage of the amount remitted to cover the vendor's expense in the collection and remittance of said tax as provided in section 39-26-105, C.R.S.

(I.5) (A) A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to any vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to this subsection (2). A vendor or retailer that has received in good faith from a qualified purchaser a direct payment permit number shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax imposed on such sale that is paid for directly from such qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of any individual.

(B) A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax levied on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to this subsection (2) in the same manner as liability would be imposed on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (5).

The executive director of the department of revenue shall administer, collect, and distribute any sales tax imposed in conformity with this article. The executive director of the department of revenue shall make monthly distributions of such sales tax collections to the district. The department of revenue shall retain an amount not to exceed the net incremental cost of such administration, collection, and distribution and shall transmit such amount to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund; except that the amount retained by the department of revenue in any given fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 1994, shall not exceed the amount retained by the department in the 1993-94 fiscal year, as adjusted in accordance with changes in the consumer price index for the Denver-Boulder consolidated metropolitan statistical area. The cost of such administration, collection, and distribution shall be the audited net incremental cost thereof reduced by the amount of interest earned on such sales tax collections prior to distribution to the district.

to (8) Repealed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 718, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-18.

L. 71:

p. 978, § 2.

L. 73:

p. 991, § 2.

L. 79:

(1)(n) amended, p. 1626, § 42, effective June 8.

L. 80:

(1.9) added and (2) R&RE, p. 680, §§ 3, 4, effective May 1.

L. 82:

(1.9), (2)(b)(II)(B), (2)(b)(VI), and (2)(b)(VII) repealed, (2)(a), (2)(b)(I), (2)(b)(II), and (2)(b)(III) amended, and (2)(b)(V) R&RE, pp. 502, 498, 500, §§ 8, 1, 2, 3, effective April 15; (2)(b)(II)(B) RC&RE, p. 643, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 83:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1209, § 2, effective May 1; (1)(b), (2)(b)(I), (2)(b)(II)(B), and (2)(b)(III)(A) amended, p. 1282, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 87:

(2)(b)(III)(A) amended and (3) to (8) added, pp. 1252, 1249, §§ 5, 4, effective May 22; (2)(c)(II) amended, p. 1240, § 1, effective January 1, 1988.

L. 88:

(1)(l) and (1)(t) amended and (1)(l.5) added, p. 1156, § 3, effective May 3.

L. 89:

(1)(o) amended, p. 1120, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(8) amended, p. 1919, § 45, effective June 1; (2)(b)(V) repealed, p. 883, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 92:

(2)(a), (2)(b)(III), and (2)(b)(IV) amended, p. 910, § 163, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(2)(c)(II) amended, p. 318, § 4, effective March 29; (2)(b) and (3) to (8) repealed, p. 1327, § 9, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(2)(b.5) added, p. 805, § 2, effective May 20; (1)(t) amended, p. 932, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 99:

(2)(a) amended, p. 982, § 5, effective May 28; (2)(a) amended, p. 1357, § 6, effective January 1, 2000; (2)(c)(I.5) added, p. 14, § 7, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2000:

(1)(m) amended, p. 307, § 2, effective April 5.

L. 2002:

IP(2)(a) amended, p. 714, § 4, effective August 7; IP(2)(a) amended, p. 734, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1039, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(2)(a) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 49, § 4, effective March 2; (2)(a)(III) added, (HB 09-1342), ch. 354, p. 1847, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1272), ch. 337, p. 1964, § 2, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2022:

(2)(c)(I.5)(B) amended, (HB 22-1312), ch. 202, p. 1359, § 3, effective August 10.

32-9-119.1. Transportation expansion plan - utility relocation - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The district has been authorized to construct a transportation expansion plan adopted by the board and approved by the voters on November 2, 2004. The transportation expansion plan anticipates that construction will be completed on all fixed guideway corridors in a twelve-year period.

The scheduling and timely performance of the transportation expansion plan partially depends on coordination with utility companies for the prompt performance of utility relocation work necessitated by construction of the transportation expansion plan.

Increased coordination between the district and utility companies is in the public interest, and prompt performance of utility relocation work within the adopted plan schedule will reduce delays and costs of construction. Utility relocation work shall be undertaken in a manner that minimizes the relocation cost and the disruption of utility services.

The district shall negotiate with any affected utility company in each fixed guideway corridor. In coordination with the district, each utility company shall determine whether a district contractor or the utility company shall be responsible for the relocation of its utility facilities. In making such a determination, the utility company shall take into consideration the location of the utility facilities, complexity of the relocation, and timing of the need for relocation work.

The district and the utility company shall make such arrangements for funding utility relocations as are specified in the easements, licenses, franchises, or other property interests and rights of use held by the district or the utility company. Nothing in this section is intended to alter existing property agreements, licenses, or other interests of the district and utility company regarding the obligation to pay for utility relocation.

The district may enter into fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreements with a utility company. Such agreements shall be for the performance of all services required to assure timely relocation of utilities according to the most current written standards and practices established by the utility company at the time the agreement is entered into, unless other standards are mutually selected by the district and the utility company.

A fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreement shall include a schedule for design, review, dispute resolution, and construction.

A fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreement may provide for a utility company betterment, including, but not limited to, increased capacity and extensions of services; except that a betterment shall not materially delay project construction and shall be at the expense of the utility company.

As used in this section, "betterment" means any upgrade of the utility facility being relocated that is not attributable to project construction and is made solely for the benefit of and at the election of the utility.

A fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreement may incorporate reasonable and appropriate conditions, including, but not limited to, conditions for ensuring:

The prompt performance of utility relocation work by either the district, utility company, or contractor for the transportation expansion plan, as specified in the agreement;

The cooperation of the utility company with the contractor for the transportation expansion plan; and

The payment by the utility company of any damages caused by the company's delay in the performance of the relocation work or interference with the performance of the project by any other contractor, except when such delay or interference is caused by a force majeure.

All design and construction of utility relocation shall be subject to review and approval by district and utility company engineers.

If the district and utility company are unable to reach a fixed guideway corridor utility relocation agreement, or if utility relocation disputes arise under an agreement, the district and utility company shall each designate an official, at no level lower than district corridor project manager and utility company chief engineer, to resolve the differences.

If the differences cannot be resolved pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), utility relocation disputes shall be heard in the following district courts for each of the following corridors and projects:

For union station, Denver county district court;

For the U.S. 36 corridor, Boulder county district court;

For the west corridor, Jefferson county district court;

For the gold line corridor, Jefferson county district court;

For the east corridor, Denver county district court;

For the I-225 corridor, Arapahoe county district court;

For the southwest corridor, Arapahoe county district court; and

For the north corridor, Adams county district court.

It shall be presumed that there will be irreparable harm to the public if an injunction is not granted to require utility relocation, regardless of a later determination as to which party is responsible for the cost of relocation.

The district shall provide a utility company with detailed maps, drawings, plans, and profiles of the district's proposed improvements in each fixed guideway corridor in the transportation expansion plan at:

The conclusion of preliminary engineering;

Sixty percent completion of final design;

The conclusion of final design; and

Such other times as may be requested by the utility company.

The district shall solicit information as to the location of utility facilities within the fixed guideway corridor from the utility company.

For all utilities identified on any documents provided to or in the possession of the district, the district shall provide written notice to a utility company as soon as practicable of a transportation expansion plan that will require the relocation of the company's facilities.

Where documents have been in the possession of the district during final design of a fixed guideway corridor, the district shall provide notice to a utility company of a transportation expansion plan that will require the relocation of the company's facilities not later than one year before relocation is required for each relocation on each fixed guideway corridor.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), if major electrical facilities must be relocated, the district shall provide notice to a utility company at least eighteen months in advance of the required relocation date or the district shall pay the cost of any temporary relocation measures required to maintain service to utility customers. If temporary relocation measures are necessary, such measures shall be provided at the lowest possible cost during construction and relocation.

For any discovery of utilities during construction that are not identified on documents provided to or in possession of the district, the district and the utility company shall confer within forty-eight hours of discovery to determine appropriate relocation procedures.

The district and utility company shall, within ten days of discovery, enter into an agreement as to the manner in which any necessary relocation will be accomplished and the party that shall perform the work.

If an agreement is reached and if the utility company performs under the agreement, the utility company shall not be liable for delay damages as provided in subsection (8) of this section.

For purposes of ensuring continuation of required utility services to the residents of the district during and after construction of the fixed guideway corridors, the district may provide, and condemn when necessary, replacement easements for the relocation of utilities. If such replacement easements are necessary, the district shall endeavor to meet any existing standards of the utility for easements. Any necessary condemnation shall be considered a transportation project undertaken by the district. The cost of replacement easements shall be paid:

(I) By the district in those instances where the district has acquired, at no extra cost, an easement previously owned and occupied by the utility; or

(II) By the utility if the district has compensated the utility for a previously occupied easement from which the utility is being relocated.

Notwithstanding any local law to the contrary, aboveground utility facilities shall be relocated aboveground and underground utility facilities shall be relocated underground. To minimize the cost of the reconfiguration of the utility facility, the replacement easement shall be acquired as close as possible to the original location of the facility that must be relocated.

Where the utility company has elected to perform relocation work or where there has been no agreement reached between a utility company and the district, the utility company shall be liable to the district for actual damages suffered by the district as a direct result of the utility company's delay in the performance of any utility relocation work or as a direct result of the utility company's interference with the performance of fixed guideway corridor construction by other contractors.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), a utility company shall not be liable for damages caused by the failure to timely perform the relocation work or the interference with the performance of the transportation expansion plan by another contractor when the failure to perform or the interference is caused by a force majeure.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 718, § 2, effective May 3.

32-9-119.3. Elections for sales tax rate increase.

The board, in accordance with the provisions of section 20 (4) of article X of the state constitution, may submit to the registered electors of the district one or more ballot questions to increase the rate of the sales tax levied by the district pursuant to section 32-9-119 (2)(a) to any rate approved by the board, with or without an accompanying increase in district debt, for such purposes authorized by this article as may be specified in any such ballot question.

A ballot question submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted at a general election or an election held on the first Tuesday of November in an odd-numbered year that is conducted in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The secretary of state shall determine the identifying numbering or lettering of such a ballot question, and the question shall be printed upon the ballot immediately following any statewide amendments and propositions.

If a majority of the registered electors voting on a ballot question submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section vote affirmatively on the question, the rate of the sales tax levied by the district pursuant to section 32-9-119 (2)(a) shall be increased to the rate specified in the ballot question and approved by the registered electors.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of the district to seek the approval of the registered electors of the district regarding any other matter for which such approval may be sought.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 806, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 49, § 5, effective March 2; (2) amended, (HB09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1182, § 19, effective May 15.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9)(b) provided for the repeal of this section, effective November 4, 1997, when the registered electors of the district voted negatively on the ballot question set forth in § 32-9-119.3 (2)(b).